District of Columbia statutes.
8-1774.01

Contract with a Sustainable Energy Utility.

(a)

The Mayor, by, and through DDOE, shall contract with a SEU to conduct sustainable energy programs on behalf of the District of Columbia.

(b)

The SEU shall be a private entity.

(c)

The SEU shall conduct the sustainable energy programs under a brand name to be determined by the District Department of the Environment.

(d)

The SEU contract shall:

(1)

Provide minimum performance benchmarks consistent with the purposes of this chapter, including:

(A)

Reducing energy consumption in the District;

(B)

Increasing renewable energy generating capacity in the District;

(C)

Increasing the energy efficiency and renewable energy generating capacity of low-income housing, shelters, clinics, or other buildings serving low-income residents in the District; and

(D)

Increasing the number of green-collar jobs in the District; and

(2)

Require the SEU to track and report to DDOE, at least semiannually, on the reduction of the growth in peak electricity demand and the reduction in the growth of energy demand of the District’s largest energy users due to SEU programs.

(e)

The SEU contract shall be funded by the SETF. The SEU contract may also be funded by any other source of funding available to the Mayor, including:

(1)

Federal funds;

(2)

Private funds, subject to DDOE approval; and

(3)

Other District funds.

(f)

All funds used to support the SEU contract shall be managed by the Fiscal Agent.

(g)

The SEU contract shall permit coordination with any similar private entity operating in an adjacent or nearby jurisdiction.

(h)

The use of private grant money by the SEU shall be subject to DDOE approval.

(i)

Notwithstanding the provisions of Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 [§ 2-301.01 et seq.], the SEU contract shall be awarded pursuant to the procedure set forth under this subchapter.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 201, 55 DCR 9225
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6062(a), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6092(a), 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 8-1774.02, § 8-1774.03, and § 8-1774.04.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (d)(4).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (d).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6062(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6062(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6092(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).